Hawaii, session 2026, SB552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the land study bureau soil rating system has not been updated since its creation in the 1960s and 1970s, leading to outdated assessments of land quality and productivity.  Act 189, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, highlighted the need for regular updates to soil data to ensure that agricultural land classification reflects current soil science and supports Hawaii's food security and sustainability goals.  Without updated and accurate soil information, the State cannot effectively assess agricultural land suitability or prioritize investments in agricultural sustainability. The legislature further finds that accurate and up-to-date soil data, including soil characteristics, properties, and limitations, is essential for identifying risks and assessing soil suitability for various agricultural uses.  Reliable soil assessments can help optimize public and private investments in agriculture, ensuring that farmers, landowners, and policymakers make informed decisions that align with the State's long-term sustainability objectives.  However, the lack of a standardized system for regularly updating soil information has undermined the credibility of agricultural land assessments and limited the effectiveness of state-level planning and conservation efforts. The legislature finds that healthy soils are vital for sustainable agriculture, climate resilience, and food security in Hawaii.  Soil health directly affects crop productivity, water retention, erosion control, and carbon sequestration, all of which are essential to reducing agricultural vulnerability and enhancing environmental sustainability. The legislature further finds that investing in soil health aligns with Hawaii's goal of achieving net-negative carbon emissions by 2045 and promotes climate-smart agricultural practices that benefit farmers and the broader community.  Healthy soils improve nutrient cycling, reduce reliance on synthetic fertilizers, enhance microbial biodiversity, and increase resilience to extreme weather events. The legislature also recognizes that existing soil health initiatives, such as the compost reimbursement program and the cover crop pilot program, have demonstrated strong demand and effectiveness in promoting soil restoration and conservation. However, these programs currently operate independently, and a coordinated, long-term strategy is necessary to maximize impact and ensure program efficiency. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish and appropriate funds for a healthy soils program within the department of agriculture to: (1)  Integrate and manage existing programs, including the compost reimbursement program and cover crop reimbursement pilot program, under a unified healthy soils program framework; (2)  Provide education and technical assistance to farmers, ranchers, and landowners to support the adoption of healthy soil practices; (3)  Administer financial incentives and awards to encourage the implementation of regenerative agricultural practices that build soil carbon stocks and improve soil structure; and (4)  Update and refine soil data used in the land study bureau soil rating system by incorporating the latest United States Department of Agriculture Natural Resources Conservation Service soil data and other relevant soil classification systems. SECTION 2.  Chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§141-     Healthy soils program; established.  (a) The department of agriculture shall establish a healthy soils program to support and promote farm management practices that improve soil health, increase soil carbon sequestration, and enhance agricultural sustainability.  The department of agriculture may consult with or contract a third party for any needed expertise to perform its duties pursuant to this section. (b)  The healthy soils program shall: (1)  Include and administer the compost reimbursement program established pursuant to section 141-16 and cover crop reimbursement pilot program established pursuant to Act 312, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022; provided that the department ensures that these programs align with the objectives and standards of the healthy soils program to maximize benefits to farmers and enhance statewide soil health; (2)  Subject to available funding, provide: (A)  Technical assistance and education to farmers, ranchers, and landowners to support the adoption of best soil health practices; (B)  Financial incentives and awards to encourage the implementation of regenerative agricultural practices that improve soil carbon storage, water retention, and nutrient cycling; and (C)  Soil health assessments and data collection to guide statewide policy decisions and program adjustments; (3)  Update and refine the soil data used in the land study bureau soil rating system by considering: (A)  The latest United States Department of Agriculture Natural Resources Conservation Service soil data; and (B)  Soil classification systems currently used in the State, including methodologies assessing soil carbon storage, water retention, and nutrient cycling; (4)  Develop a standardized process for the regular integration of updated soil data, ensuring soil ratings reflect current conditions and advances in soil science; and (5)  Create high-resolution digital soil maps that: (A)  Accurately depict soil properties, risks, and suitability for different agricultural uses; (B)  Serve as a decision-making tool for farmers, policymakers, and investors; and (C)  Integrate real-time monitoring capabilities, allowing for adjustments as soil conditions evolve. (d)  A public review process shall be established by the department to evaluate and refine updated soil data and draft soil maps. (e)  The department may collaborate with the following agencies for the purposes of the healthy soils program: (1)  The United States Department of Agriculture Natural Resources Conservation Service; (2)  The department of land and natural resources; (3)  The land use commission; (4)  The agribusiness development corporation; (5)  The office of planning and sustainable development; (6)  The university of Hawaii's college of tropical agriculture and human resilience; and (7)  The county planning agencies. (f)  The department of agriculture shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. The report shall include updates on soil data integration detailing the following: (1)  Progress on soil data updates; (2)  Mapping improvements and refinements; and (3)  Recommendations for legislative or regulatory changes needed to align soil classification with updated scientific data." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of the healthy soils program and to issue awards and other financial incentives pursuant to the program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.